udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N4 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсам [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX N4 0 ъёсамы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсад [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсады [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсаз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсазы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осам [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осамы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осад [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осады [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осаз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осазы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсам [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсамы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсад [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсады [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсаз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсазы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # входн.п.
SFX N4 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # исходн.п.
SFX N4 0 осысь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсысь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтым [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтыды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысьтызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осысьтым [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысьтымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысьтыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысьтыды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысьтыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысьтызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтым [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтымы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтыд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтыды [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтыз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысьтызы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысен [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # отдал.п.
SFX N4 0 осысен [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсысен [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысеным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N4 0 ъёсысенымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысеныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысеныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысеныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсысенызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осысеным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысенымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысеныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысеныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысеныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осысенызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсысеным [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысенымы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысеныд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысеныды [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысеныз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсысенызы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсэтӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # перех.п.
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осэтӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсэтӥ [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥ [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстӥзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 остӥм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остӥзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥм [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥмы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥды [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстӥзы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёслань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # направ.п.
SFX N4 0 ослань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёслань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсылань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдлань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызлань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмылань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстылань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссылань [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # предельн.п.
SFX N4 0 осозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсыдозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсызозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсмыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёстыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёссыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозям [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозямы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозяд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозяды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозяз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 ъёсозязы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N4 0 осыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осыдозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осызозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осмыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 остыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 оссыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозям [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозямы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозяд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозяды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозяз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 осозязы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N4 0 ёсыозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсыдозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсызозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсмыозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёстыозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёссыозь [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозям [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозямы [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозяд [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозяды [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозяз [ьъй]
SFX N4 0 ёсозязы [ьъй]
